Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
2D]

MARKET
CONDUCT

[§431:2D-101] Legislative intent. The
purpose of this article is to establish a framework for insurance division
market conduct actions, including:

(1) Processes and systems for identifying, assessing,
and prioritizing market conduct problems that have a substantial adverse impact
on consumers, policyholders, and claimants;

(2) Market conduct actions by the commissioner to
substantiate those market conduct problems and a means to remedy significant
market conduct problems; and

(3) Procedures to communicate and coordinate market
conduct actions among states to foster the most efficient and effective use of
resources. [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next